Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.070

Registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation registered to transact business in this state must continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2136; 2002 c 297 s 43; 1989 c 165 s 175.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.